


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Value Fund (TRVLX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Value Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				TRVLX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/25/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$37.30
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.13
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/25/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								10.85%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$32.22
							
							-
							
								$37.30
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$24,364.55

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 06/30/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Value Fund among 
1091,
1091,
936
and 
681
Large Value
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 06/30/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to provide long-term capital appreciation by investing in common stocks believed to be undervalued. Income is a secondary objective.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					17.93%
				
			

				
					17.93%
				
			


3 Years

				
					7.11%
				
			

				
					7.11%
				
			


5 Years

				
					15.40%
				
			

				
					15.40%
				
			


10 Years

				
					6.62%
				
			

				
					6.62%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 11.07%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							11.07%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							September 30, 1994
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.82%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.82%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			



2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now




































	CMCAX - CM Commodity Index Fund | Snapshot | Mutual Fund- VanEck









Menu



Contact

































United States
Australia
Austria
Chile
Denmark
Finland
Germany
Ireland
Italy
Luxembourg
Netherlands
Norway
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland
United Kingdom
Rest of World








Corporate Home




                                United States
                            




Contact Us



                            Search
                        






























Home » VanEck Funds » Mutual Funds » CMCAX - CM Commodity Index Fund
             » Overview
        









  PDF







Share on Facebook Facebook
Share on StumbleUpon StumbleUpon


Share on LinkedIn LinkedIn
Submit to Reddit reddit


Tweet Twitter
Pin it Pinterest


Share on Google+ Google+
Share on Digg Digg


Post to Tumblr Tumblr
Share on Delicious  Delicious








CMCAXCM Commodity Index Fund
        



















            Ticker:-
            CMCAX;false;CMCITR;
        










            Ticker Group:-
            CMC;false;CMCITR;
        













              Class A - CMCAX
            

              Class I - COMIX
            

              Class Y - CMCYX
            















                Videos


Demand for Oil Strong Despite Anemic Global Growth (3:49)Shawn Reynolds


Commodities Rebound Gaining Momentum (4:11)Roland Morris


View more videos















 
 

















                    Individual Investors




                        Subscribe to email updates
                    

Subscribe now





        Financial Professionals





                    Subscribe to email updates, or 
password protected financial professional-only content
                

                    LOGIN
                


                        email address/username
                    


                         
                    



                        password
                    


                         
                    




New? Register Here


Forgot Password























How To Purchase
Learn more on how to purchase shares of VanEck Funds





























Daily Price
                      
as of 07/25/17




NAV†
DAILY CHANGE


$4.61
 $0.04 / +0.9%

































Class A Details: CMCAX



              INCEPTION DATE
            

              GROSS/NET EXPENSES1


12/31/10
1.31%/0.95%


















                Fund Literature
            


Fact Sheet


Summary Prospectus


Annual Report


Semi-Annual Report


















							Overview
						



							Performance
						



							Portfolio Analytics
						



							Investment Team
						



							Commentary
						



							Fees & Minimums
						















 

Fund Summary and Key Points
The VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund (the "Fund") seeks to track, before fees and expenses, the UBS Bloomberg Constant Maturity Commodity Index (the “CMCI”). CMCI is a next-generation commodity index diversified across maturities, minimizing its exposure to the front end of the futures curvesBy spreading its exposure across multiple maturities and maintaining a constant maturity per commodity, CMCI seeks to mitigate the impacts of negative roll yield in contango environmentsDiversified across five commodity sectors and 27 commodity components; energy allocation typically around 35%In contrast with many “enhanced” commodity funds, offers “pure” commodity exposure by investing in commodity-linked derivative instruments and more conservative fixed income securities, such as U.S. Treasury Bills













 Making the Investment Case for CMCIStrategy Overview: Constant Maturity Commodity Index











                 


Using the Constant Maturity Approach to Commodities (7:28)Roland Morris























Fund Details as of 06/30/17


Net Assets (All Classes)
$327.0M


Number of Commodity Sectors
5


Number of Commodity Components
27


Avg. Weighted Contract Maturity
6.7 Months


Benchmark Index
UBS Bloomberg Constant Maturity Commodity Index (CMCI)



















Investment Approach

The VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund is a passively-managed mutual fund that seeks to track the CMCI by primarily investing in commodity-linked derivative instruments and conservatively-managed fixed income instruments. 


The Fund may invest in instruments linked to the value of a particular commodity or commodity futures contract, or a subset of commodities or commodity futures contracts, through a wholly owned subsidiary of the Fund formed in the Cayman Islands. 






 




























Performance History: Average Annual Total Returns* (%)
                  Month End
                  as of 06/30/17
                  Quarter End
                  as of 06/30/171 MO3 MOYTD1 YR3 YR5 YR10 YRLIFE(12/31/10)VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund: Class AAt Net Asset Value0.00-3.62-4.83-2.73-14.51-8.72---8.48At Maximum 5.75% Sales Charge-5.82-9.22-10.30-8.29-16.19-9.79---9.31UBS Bloomberg CMCI Index20.22-3.28-4.12-1.30-13.27-7.43-3.07--
                  Quarter End as of 06/30/171 MO3 MOYTD1 YR3 YR5 YR10 YRLIFE(12/31/10)VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund: Class AAt Net Asset Value0.00-3.62-4.83-2.73-14.51-8.72---8.48At Maximum 5.75% Sales Charge-5.82-9.22-10.30-8.29-16.19-9.79---9.31UBS Bloomberg CMCI Index20.22-3.28-4.12-1.30-13.27-7.43-3.07--*Returns less than one year are not annualized.The table presents past performance which is no guarantee of future results and which may be lower or higher than current performance. Returns reflect temporary contractual fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements. Had the Fund incurred all expenses and fees1, investment returns would have been reduced. Expenses: Class A: Gross 1.31% and Net 0.95%. Expenses are capped contractually through 05/01/18 at 0.95% for Class A. Investment returns and Fund share values will fluctuate so that investors' shares, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Fund returns assume that dividends and capital gains distributions have been reinvested in the Fund at NAV. 















CMCI Target Sector Weightings (%): Overview for 2016-2017






Sector
% OF NET ASSETS




											■
										
Energy
34.2
#40699c

34.2




											■
										
Agriculture
29.2
#215465

29.2




											■
										
Industrial Metals
26.8
#3c8da3

26.8




											■
										
Precious Metals
5.4
#a3cd3b

5.4




											■
										
Livestock
4.4
#7f9a48

4.4
























Contact UsPrivacyLegalFeedbackSitemap











Important Disclosure 
Unless otherwise stated, portfolio facts and statistics are shown for Class A shares; other classes may have different characteristics. 
†NAV: Unless you are eligible for a waiver, the public offering price you pay when you buy Class A shares of the Fund is the Net Asset Value (NAV) of the shares plus an initial sales charge. The initial sales charge varies depending upon the size of your purchase.  No sales charge is imposed where Class A shares are issued to you pursuant to the automatic investment of income dividends or capital gains distribution. It is the responsibility of the financial intermediary to ensure that the investor obtains the proper “breakpoint” discount. Class I and Class Y do not have an initial sales charge. See the 
                 
    prospectus for more information.
1Van Eck Absolute Return Advisers Corporation (the “Adviser”) has agreed to waive fees and/or pay Fund expenses to the extent necessary to prevent the operating expenses of the Fund (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, interest expense, trading
            expenses, dividends and interest payments on securities sold short, taxes and extraordinary expenses) from exceeding 0.95% for Class A, 0.65% for Class I, and 0.70% for Class Y of the Fund’s average daily net assets per year until May 1, 2018. During such time, the
            expense limitation is expected to continue until the Board of Trustees acts to discontinue all or a portion of such expense limitation.

2The UBS Bloomberg Constant Maturity Commodity Index (CMCI) is a Total Return rules-based composite benchmark index diversified across 27 commodity components from within five sectors, specifically energy, precious metals, industrial metals, agricultural and livestock. The S&P® 500 Index consists of 500 widely held common stocks covering industrial, utility, financial and transportation sectors. The S&P® Goldman Sachs Commodity Total Return Index (SPGSCITR) is a composite index of commodity sector returns, representing an unleveraged, long-only investment in commodity futures. The Bloomberg Barclays US Aggregate Bond (BbgBarc US Agg Bond) Index is composed of the mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities and government/credit bonds. All indices are unmanaged and include the reinvestment of all dividends, but do not reflect the payment of transaction costs, advisory fees or expenses that are associated with an investment in the Fund. An index’s performance is not illustrative of the Fund’s performance. Indices are not securities in which investments can be made.

UBS and Bloomberg own or exclusively license, solely or jointly as agreed between them, all proprietary rights with respect to the Index. In no way do UBS or Bloomberg sponsor or endorse, nor are they otherwise involved in the issuance and offering of the Fund, nor do either of them make any representation or warranty, express or implied, to the holders of the Fund or any member of the public regarding the advisability of investing in the Fund or commodities generally or in futures particularly, or as to results to be obtained from the use of the Index or from the Fund.
The views and opinions expressed are those of VanEck. Fund manager commentaries are general in nature and should not be construed as investment advice. Opinions are subject to change with market conditions. Any discussion of specific securities mentioned in the commentaries is neither an offer to sell nor a solicitation to buy these securities. Fund holdings will vary.

You can lose money by investing in the Fund. Any investment in the Fund should be part of an overall investment program, not a complete program. Commodities are assets that have tangible properties, such as oil, metals, and agriculture. Commodities and commodity-linked derivatives may be affected by overall market movements and other factors that affect the value of a particular industry or commodity, such as weather, disease, embargoes or political or regulatory developments. The value of a commodity-linked derivative is generally based on price movements of a commodity, a commodity futures contract, a commodity index or other economic variables based on the commodity markets. Derivatives use leverage, which may exaggerate a loss. The Fund is subject to the risks associated with its investments in commodity-linked derivatives, risks of investing in wholly owned subsidiary, risk of tracking error, risks of aggressive investment techniques, leverage risk, derivatives risks, counterparty risks, non-diversification risk, credit risk, concentration risk and market risk. The use of commodity-linked derivatives such as swaps, commodity-linked structured notes and futures entails substantial risks, including risk of loss of a significant portion of their principal value, lack of a secondary market, increased volatility, correlation risk, liquidity risk, interest-rate risk, market risk, credit risk, valuation risk and tax risk. Gains and losses from speculative positions in derivatives may be much greater than the derivative’s cost. At any time, the risk of loss of any individual security held by the Fund could be significantly higher than 50% of the security’s value. Investment in commodity markets may not be suitable for all investors. The Fund’s investment in commodity-linked derivative instruments may subject the Fund to greater volatility than investment in traditional securities. For a description of these and other risk considerations, please refer to the Fund’s 
        
    prospectus, which should be read carefully before you invest. Again, the Fund offers investors exposure to the broad commodity markets, currently, by investing in commodity-linked swaps.
Investing involves risk, including possible loss of principal. An investor should consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the investment company carefully before investing. The prospectus and summary prospectus contain this and other information.  Please read them carefully before investing.
 
  










Van Eck Securities Corporation, Distributor               
    666 Third Avenue               
    New York, NY 10017
800.826.2333 
©  VanEck. VanEck®, VanEck Vectors®, VanEck Access the opportunities™, and the VanEck design™ are trademarks of Van Eck Associates Corp.










×






















 







BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD. - Pooled Investment Fund- Bbl Commodities, Lp  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD.

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    Elian Fiduciary Services (Cayman) Ltd. 89 Nexus Way, Camana Bay 
    Grand Cayman, E9, KY1-9007Phone: 212-742-3700 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2016-10-13


Amended


$21,120,000


$0


Equity Only


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link




	2015-10-13


Amended


$21,120,000


$17,120,000


Equity Only


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link




	2014-10-28


New


$4,000,000


$4,000,000


Other


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 Bbl Commodities, Lp 
 Executive, Promoter 


 Bbl Gp Ii, Llc 
 Executive 


 Brian K. N. Eden 
 Director 


 Laren B. Gillespie 
 Director 


 Jonathan Goldberg 
 Executive 


 Robert L. Meschi 
 Director 


 Mark Strachan 
 Director 










 

Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd - Funding history, company info, news ...































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/companies/173344-bbl-commodities-value-offshore-fund-ltdsection=companies&subsection=detail&id=173344  




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund LtdCompany DetailsGet alertedif Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd gets funded!Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund LtdFunding history Key peopleCountry:State:City:United StatesNew YorkNew York CityIndustry:Finance Funding history DateDeal sizeInvestors October 13th, 2015$21,120,000-View DealOctober 28th, 2014$4,000,000-View DealCreate alertManage your alerts in accountWant to know when Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd gets funded?Key people-- BBL Commodities, LPExecutive Officer, Promoter-- BBL GP II, LLCExecutive OfficerBrian EdenDirectorLaren GillespieDirectorJonathan GoldbergExecutive OfficerRobert MeschiDirectorMark StrachanDirectorPlease note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!

BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD. - Who is raising money? | SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, startups and private equity companies















Who is raising money?











BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD.  Funding details


BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD. Industry: Pooled Investment FundCIK Number: 0001623226Address: ELIAN FIDUCIARY SERVICES (CAYMAN) LTD. 89 NEXUS WAY, CAMANA BAY GRAND CAYMAN KY1-9007Phone number: 212-742-3700



Latest news
BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD. raised $21,120,000 from 7 investors on 2016-10-13.



BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD. Filings

DateFiling TypeOfferedSoldRemainingMin. investmentInvest. countExemption / Exlusions
2016-10-13Amended Form DIndefinite$21,120,000Indefinite$100,000706b 3C 3C.7[SEC Filing]2015-10-13Amended Form DIndefinite$21,120,000Indefinite$1,000,000706b 3C 3C.7[SEC Filing]2014-10-28New Form DIndefinite$4,000,000Indefinite$1,000,000206b 3C 3C.7[SEC Filing]
BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD. raised $21,120,000 in total.



Directors and Executives of BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD.
Key People in BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD.:

-- BBL Commodities, LP-- BBL GP II, LLCJonathan GoldbergMark StrachanBrian EdenRobert MeschiLaren Gillespie
Similar companiesBBL Enterprises, LLC, BBL COMMODITIES VALUE FUND, LP








Last visited companies: Lateral SV, Inc., Laurion Capital Global Markets Fund LP, Laurion Capital Global Markets Fund Ltd., Leap Tide Partners, L.P., Learn-It Systems, LLC

								© whoisraisingmoney.com
Daily updated news about investment into startups, hedge funds and private equity companies.














 

Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd raised $21,120,000 on October 13th, 2015































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/deals/378880-bbl-commodities-value-offshore-fund-ltdsection=deals&subsection=detail&id=378880  




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd raised $21,120,000 on October 13th, 2015.Get alertedif Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd gets funded!Amount:$21,120,000Company:Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund LtdInvestors:-Industry:FinanceCountry:State:City:United StatesNew YorkNew York CityKey people:-- BBL Commodities, LP (Executive Officer, Promoter) -- BBL GP II, LLC (Executive Officer) Brian Eden (Director) Laren Gillespie (Director) Jonathan Goldberg (Executive Officer) Robert Meschi (Director) Mark Strachan (Director)Data sources:www.sec.gov - D/A - BBL COMMODITIES VALUE OFFSHORE FUND, LTD. (0001623226) (Filer)Description:Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd closed a 21M funding round. The investment was completed in October 13th, 2015. Bbl Commodities Value Offshore Fund Ltd is a Finance firm.Please note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!



 HFM Global | An information and networking resource

 






 





































































MENU



































SEARCH >









HFMWeek
HFM Compliance
HFM InvestHedge


EuroHedge
HFM Technology
CTA Intelligence


Absolute Return
AsiaHedge
Alt Credit Intelligence




Membership services




 
 



Recently Saved Articles

You haven't saved any articles yet!








x

Cookies
We use cookies to ensure that you enjoy the best experience on our website. If you continue, we'll assume that you are happy to receive all cookies on our website.
ACCEPT AND CONTINUE >
LEARN MORE >














Our world-class portfolio of membership services provides access, insight and deep knowledge to support hedge fund professionals in making better informed decisions.
	










START A FREE TRIAL >





FREE NEWSLETTER >








 





Actionable Intelligence

					We support a global community of hedge fund professionals by providing intelligence and insight across a
                    wide range of news, research, data, analysis, performance, events, contacts, networking opportunities and online resources
				

					These provide actionable intelligence which enable you to better raise capital, comply with regulations and benchmark against peers.
				













Tailored to Your Firm’s Needs

						Membership to HFM opens up a whole world of access, insights and content. You can choose a package to suit
                        your role and organization for a tailored and relevant solution, designed to ensure you get real value and tangible ROI.
					

						Benefit from enterprise membership which includes all of our products, a bespoke selection, or one of our suggested
                        product combinations.
					








                                        The industry’s single source of news for the global hedge fund community, we provide more fund analysis,
                                        industry research and investor news than any other forum.
                                    






                                        With technology at the forefront of your business, offering opportunity, risk and expense, we expose exposes the
                                        most essential developments and biggest stories in the hedge fund tech space.
                                    






                                        Knowing that good compliance can be a competitive advantage is a key part of running a modern hedge fund management business.
                                        HFM Compliance provides practical insight on the latest global regulatory, tax and compliance trends.
                                    








                                        Focused coverage of European single manager hedge fund performance, including fund profiles, research and rankings
                                        such as new fund, asset, admin and PB surveys, and league tables.
                                    






                                        Dedicated coverage of Asia-Pacific based hedge fund performance and hedge funds investing in the region. Featuring fund
                                        profiles, research and rankings and league tables, this is the leading title for the Asia-Pac market.
                                    






                                        Specific coverage of North American single manager hedge fund performance, including fund profiles, research and rankings
                                        such as new fund, asset, admin and PB surveys, Billion Dollar Club and league tables.
                                    








                                        Incorporating the best of HFM Investor Relations and InvestHedge and providing global coverage of the diverse range of hedge
                                        fund allocators. Featuring monthly investor mandates, research and rankings such as the FOHF Billion Dollar
                                        Club and sales and marketing advice for asset-raising.
                                    






                                        For futures specialists and commodity traders, CTA Intelligence provides daily insights and intelligence for CTA Managers
                                        into key strategic opportunities and issues globally.
                                    






                                        Specifically for managers pursuing credit and fixed income strategies, Alt Credit Intelligence is this growing sector’s
                                        best source of information covering new strategies, peer performance, compliance and investor flows.
                                    






START A FREE TRIAL







 





Membership Services

News and Analysis
Your choice of news, analysis, opinion and performance reporting relevant to your region, function or strategy, including fund profiles and launches, people moves and global rankings.




Events
Free access to our monthly breakfast briefings in North America, Asia and Europe, invites to our world-renowned summits, conferences and webinars and entry to our prestigious awards.




Data
Tracking over $2 trillion in AUM and over 17,000 funds, our database is a powerful tool used by the global hedge fund industry to benchmark performance, conduct due diligence and discover sales prospects.




Insights and Reports
Access to HFM’s monthly series of online research reports, HFM Insights, exploring different themes affecting hedge funds. Plus, receive copies of periodical special reports and the biannual Global Review.




Jobs Board
HFM advertises roles across the hedge fund industry, buy-side and sell-side, front and back office.. Search career opportunities and advertise your own job vacancies for free on our job board.




Directories
Make intelligent and informed buying decision with the HFM service directory, VendorCheck, an all-inclusive database of key industry expert contact details.








START A FREE TRIAL >

ABOUT MEMBERSHIP >




FREE NEWSLETTER >








Key Facts
The numbers that make-up the globe’s most respected and used hedge fund information brand.









787
Member organisations




106
Events a year




361
Articles a month












Events










Workshops UK  |  13 September 2017


HFM & Capital Support workshop – From Mifid II to GDPR: A guide to incoming regulations for the hedge fund CTO
A half-day educational workshop exploring the technology challenges facing hedge fund managers today and best practice tips on Mifid II and optimising tech infrastructure





Summits US  |  24 October 2017


HFM Chicago Operational Leaders Summit 2017
An exclusive networking event for senior hedge fund operations executives based in the Midwest.




 


Awards US  |  19 October 2017


HFM US Hedge Fund Performance Awards 2017
Join HFM for an evening of recognition and reward for those hedge funds that have outperformed their peers over the past 12 months.









Awards UK  |  12 September 2017


HFM European Hedge Fund Technology Awards 2017
An afternoon to acknowledge and celebrate IT and software providers serving the hedge fund sector that have demonstrated exceptional customer service and innovative product development over the past 12 months.







 



EVENTS   >










Testimonials












We have come to rely on HFM as the best source of intelligence on the hedge fund space. It carries news on the latest launches, while its events are the best industry gatherings for this sector’s key decision maker. Our membership to HFM continues to be invaluable.



Consultancy leader at a global prime brokerage business









While other publications tend to brush the surface of this industry, HFM’s strength is its ability to really cover a huge array of issues. The level of technical detail it provides serves a vital information need. We often pick up valuable insight in HFM before being told by our primes and external counsel.



General counsel at US-based $7bn manager









HFM has created a stream of information that genuinely informs us. Whether through its online coverage, or regular events, we have found that this platform is capable of providing real insight across a number of issues and for a number of different professionals and departments at my firm.



COO at UK-based $10bn + manager
















Become a Member





		Becoming an HFM member opens up a whole world of benefits for you, your
		organization and your bottom line. Start a no obligation free trial to experience our service for yourself.
	



START A FREE TRIAL





FREE NEWSLETTER












+Specialist Networks for the latest industry trends
+Direct access to Industry Intelligence
+Benchmarking Your Firm
+Global Networking Opportunities
+Unique and Actionable Data Resources
+Dedicated Analysts and Account Handlers

















































×



As part of a merger between Hedge Fund Intelligence and HFM Global, EuroHedge, AsiaHedge, Absolute Return, Absolute UCITS and InvestHedge will now be located on the HFM Global platform. You still have access to all of the content you are used to seeing from these titles, in a new, easy to navigate format. Go to the Products tab on the menu and locate the title you wish to view. 
If you are an existing subscriber you will have been sent new login credentials










BBL Commodities: 2017 Opportunities in Crude Oil, Refined Products and Natural Gas - Opalesque TV

































Welcome Guest
Sign up for free
Sign In






Opalesque TV


Most Viewed
All Videos
About




Most Viewed Videos
Most Shared Videos


List Newest Videos First
List Oldest Videos First
Show Videos on Map
List by Geographical Region

















 



Video not playing? Please email us if you need further help.





Embed

Share
Comment (1)















Tweet



















BBL Commodities: 2017 Opportunities in Crude Oil, Refined Products and Natural Gas
Mar 20 2017
1 Comment


						Jonathan Goldberg is the Founder and Chief Investment Officer of BBL Commodities LP, an investment manager which employs a fundamental, discretionary relative value strategy focused on the petroleum complex and natural gas. Jon has spent his entire career analyzing and trading in the oil and gas commodities markets, beginning at J. Aron, the commodities division of Goldman Sachs from 2003 to 2010. His first role was in working with Goldman's refining and end-user clients on structured hedging transactions before taking over a proprietary trading role.

Mr. Goldberg then worked as a partner in Glencore's oil department from 2010 through 2013, where he was responsible for helping to build the firm's US oil derivatives business. Mr. Goldberg managed a proprietary book and leveraged his financial experience as well as his understanding of the physical oil markets, and subsequently launched BBL in August of 2013, bringing several members of his Glencore team along with him.

In this Opalesque.TV interview, Mr. Goldberg discusses how his relative value commodity approach differs from many other hedge fund peers in the sector, and how the investment process more appropriately reflects the actions taken within an oil trading house.

The strategy is versatile in its application and expression and is designed to operate in different and changing market conditions. Trade expressions are predominantly designed through futures based spreads, with a focus on the middle part of the futures curve. Whilst the strategy may take directional exposure, it typically has no directional bias and provides diversity by being comprised of different trades through the petroleum complex, which at times may be independently bullish or bearish in nature.

The foundation of the investment process is the fundamental analysis of micro supply and demand balances in global oil and micro oil market, seeking to identify and capitalize on the potentially substantial mispricing that exists in the market, due to seasonal trends, poor understanding of the dynamics of the forward curve and incomplete supply and demand analysis by market participants.

Jon describes what makes the market environment in 2017 flush with opportunity sets for relative value oil trading, particularly due to OPEC’s crude oil production cuts and US supply growth. Relative value oil traders can capitalize on such movements, trading the front of the curve versus the back of the curve.

Learn more about:Why OPEC’s production cuts combined with US production trough drives relative value trade opportunitiesThe impact of upcoming spec changes coming to the US market, and why regulatory changes will increase global distillate demandThe importance of a diversified set of positions into different themesNatural gas market sell-offs in 2017 due to historically warm weatherNatural gas production is actually declining on a year-on-year basis in both 2016 and 2017Why gas markets may see very large inventory declines going through the summer and into the winter of 2018, driving higher prices for the forward curveHow a strategy based on relative value is able to operate in different and changing market conditionsImportance of diversity in positions [less]


						Jonathan Goldberg is the Founder and Chief Investment Officer of BBL Commodities LP, an investment manager which employs a fundamental, discretionary relative value strategy focused on the petroleum complex and natural gas. Jon has spent his entire career analyzing and trading in the oil and gas commodities markets, beginning at J. Aron, the commodities division of Goldman Sachs from 2003 to 2010. His first role was in working with Goldman's refining and end-user clients on structured hedging transactions before taking over a proprietary trading ro						...more










More videos about 
		CTAs & Managed Futures, Niche Strategies, Research/Education. Location: New York
			» 
 




						Jack Schwager presents: 15 Hedge Fund Market Wizards trading secrets & insights in their own words Opalesque.TV interview Part 1







						Jim Chanos: Psychology of short selling; China makes Europe, U.S. debt look like child's play







						Subduing the enemy: The Ins and Outs of Volatility Trading







						Elena Ambrosiadou Opalesque.TV interview Part 1







						So You Want to Start a Hedge Fund? Lessons from 120 early stage hedge fund investments, 40 manager seeds




 


Anthony Ward, Armajaro





Jack Schwager's new book “Market Sense and Nonsense” – 30 years observing investment mistakes Opalesque.TV interview Part 2





George Schultze:  The Art of Vulture Investing





Karsten Schroeder, Amplitude Capital: Can German engineering drive a CTA? Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





Chess Grandmaster turns hedge fund manager seeded by Peter Thiel


 


Chenavari Investment Managers: One of Europe's top performing hedge funds





Chronic difficulty and failure raising assets: Why 89% of all hedge funds never get over $100m





The “Twitter Hedge Fund”: Harnessing the power of social media for investment direction





Kerrisdale Capital: How do people react these days to a hedge fund making 200% a year? Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





Dr. Lars Jaeger on Hedge Fund Replication and Alternative Beta Opalesque.TV interview Part 1


 


Structural Alpha:  Learn from the successes of Buffett and Einhorn





A multi-family office backing prop traders, market makers and CTAs





Ex-Wharton professor builds next generation trading platform - “systematic equivalent of prop desk”





Barney Schauble, Nephila Capital: Investing in reinsurance and weather risk Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





Bob Treue - The Barnegat Fund:  Overcoming the myth of Long-Term Capital Management


 


Topwater risk-based managed account platform attracts more traders and investors





Commodities wizard Renée Haugerud: What you should know about the coming “inverse stagflation”





Adam Rodman, one of Forbes’ “30 under 30”:  Contrarian in a consensus world





Jerry Swank: U.S. Energy Master Limited Partnerships (MLPs)  best performing asset class last 10, 5, and 3 yrs





Giovanni de Francisci: The "unconventional" hedge fund investor


 


Melvyn Teo, Associate Professor of Finance at Singapore Management University and Director of BNP Paribas Hedge Fund Centre





Francois Bonnin Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





Francois-Serge Lhabitant: The professor who runs $5-$6 billion in hedge funds





Systematic Trading: Low volatility systems no guarantee to avoid "Risk of Ruin"





Narayan Naik, Professor of Finance, Director Hedge Fund Research Centre,  London Business School on Opalesque.TV interview Part 1


 


Ernesto Prado: “Hedging 2.0”: Why combining a long and a short doesn't mean you're hedged





Deepak Gurnani:  How a "risk master" addresses hedge funds' "average" risk management Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





Alexander Ineichen: Why the investment case for hedge funds is still sound





Dr. Galen Burghardt:  Measuring the impact of trend following in the CTA space





The Art of Buying a Hedge Fund: Why more firms are now looking to acquire a hedge fund, but mergers can also fail


 


Peter Lunzer: Liquid Investments -- All about investing in wine Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





Eric Rosenfeld: How institutional investors have come to recognize the value of activist investing





Hanming Rao: High Alpha, high Sharpe using Weekly-Expiry Options





Kaizen: How to target and achieve 30-35% compound annual net return





Up 90% in 2014:  Adam Tomas, a different systematic long term trend follower trading “axiomatic regularities”


 


Uncorrelated Investments Show Episode 3: Players in the MF Global saga tell their stories





Thomas Stridsman: How to make money in short term trend following, in a challenging market





Why have 14 blue chip hedge fund managers acquired or started reinsurers?





Alain De Coster: Institutions shift to long-short hedge funds for equity exposure





André Steyn: Africa's leading short-seller


 


“Quit your job and live off what you can take out of the markets”





Positive Convexity: How a CTA has outperformed the index by +7.5% annually





40+ years trading veteran sees multi-year bull market in agriculture...but not for the "dumb" money





Three Arrows Capital: Fast growing emerging markets hedge fund





Insurance Linked Securities (ILS) market poised for growth, offering enhanced and uncorrelated performance


 


Survival instincts through Black Swan Events define the best hedge fund managers





Opalesque Campus: Top Hedge Fund Academic - Operational Due Diligence as a Source of Alpha





Hancock Agricultural Investment Group - An "institutional" asset manager in agriculture





The CAIA Association:  Determining global asset allocation trends and rapidly growing Asia hedge fund centers





Aquila Capital Green Assets: Producing food instead of speculating with food


 


Simon Lack: The Hedge Fund Mirage – T-Bills better than hedge funds?





Former Lehman veterans roll out one of the first systematic, innovative volatility funds





Guan Ong, Blue Rice Investment Management: Opportunities in Asian corporate credit





Agriculture Investing in Latin America: Argentina and Uruguay, an "amazing story"





NEW: The Opalesque Uncorrelated Investments Show


 


John Taylor, FX Concepts: Forex heyday far from over





Claude Porret: Why investing with Emerging Managers can be safer than with large or even “legends” hedge funds





Nancy Havens-Hasty:  How to succeed and build a long-term track record in M+A hedge fund strategies





Emerging Markets Fund Panel, Jeffries Prime Brokerage Conference Opalesque.TV interview Part 2





CIAM: Paris-based pure, concentrated merger arbitrage fund managed by 3 French Power Women


 


The New Green Revolution: GAIA Capital on opportunities in agriculture and resources





5192% since inception, 31.1% average net annual return





Tim Coffin: Capital scarcity creates attractive investment opportunities in shipping





Jack Schwager discusses FundSeeder, a free platform to find undiscovered worldwide trading talent





Cavenagh Capital: statistical concepts help macro traders deal with a changed world


 


Finding the right “building blocks” for Man Group's $13.2 bln multi-manager business





Laffitte Capital: Unique edge through adding quantitative elements to merger arbitrage strategies





Puzzle Capital: Outperforming in Merger Arbitrage





Craig Asche, CAIA Association: Education is key for alternative investments





Third Friday Total Return Fund, one of the best performing hedge funds on a risk-adjusted basis, gets institutional traction


 


Tantalum Capital: One of South Africa's leading hedge funds





Dave Fishwick: Avoid forecasts, watch for emotions: How to excel in Global Macro





Mark Okada (Highland Capital): From the first CLO to alternative mutual funds (Part 1) Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





South African hedge fund outperforms global peers three years going





Bob Discolo: Hedge funds are still in the early stages of evolution (Part 1) Opalesque.TV interview Part 1


 


Chris McGuire: Uncorrelated Returns through unique asset swaps and convertible bonds in Japan





Family Office Winged Foot Capital: Focus on niche, uncorrelated strategies with consistent risk-adjusted returns





Arcus - Making money while markets "go nowhere": smart money coming back to Japan





David Baran:  Piling up profits from Japan M&A boom which is missed by most investors due to 'can't make money in Japan' bias





Episode Two of Uncorrelated Investing


 


AllMountain Capital: Managed Futures now a small, but growing industry in Switzerland





Francois Dotta: Trade finance generates consistent and uncorrelated returns with low volatility





Kirby Daley: A cancer of debt - what it means for hedge fund investors





Smn Investment Services: Isn’t the discretionary trader the real “black box”?





SSARIS: How crisis alpha / divergent strategies help produce absolute return


 


Eoin Murray: From CIO Old Mutual Asset Managers ($12bn) to hedge fund founder





Opportunities in Frontier Markets: Mongolia, the fastest growing economy of the world





Michael Kao: Combining different parts of the capital structure for thematically diversified portfolios with asymmetric profiles





Coriolis Capital: Lack of correlation, Libor+ returns, low volatility and liquidity drive ILS funds





Oldest South African hedge fund, up 30% annualised for 17 years, to close soon to new investments


 


Guggenheim Investment Advisors: Charles Stucke on merits of behavioral finance, contrarianism





Opalesque.TV: Soft commodities trader David Stephen Martin’s rise to institutional-grade CTA





IPM: Why CTAs aren't enough to effectively hedge institutions' equity exposure





AIMA:  Understanding the uncertain global regulatory framework for hedge funds





Top performing Legends Fund offers daily access to a portfolio of mostly closed hedge fund legends since 2010


 


Gapstow Capital Partners: A broader definition of credit opportunities





Istar Capital:  The only CTA seeded by an institutional investor in 2011





A Discussion with Jeff Kong: His Top-Ranked Fund Strategy and Why Carry is King





HiQ Invest: How to add up to 150 clients per month





Benjamin Ball: Excellence at pitching vs. Excellence at investing


 


Steve Diggle: From Artradis to Vulpes





Trade Finance: No down month since 2006 and best years still ahead





Opalesque.TV: Why women outperform male money managers: Biological, cognitive, and behavioral aspects





Uncorrelated Investments Show with Prof. Thomas Schneeweis





Investcorp Research:  The great misallocation - larger hedge funds are not safer than emerging managers Opalesque.TV interview Part 2


 


Saemor Capital: one of the largest and most successful European market-neutral hedge funds





State Street Global Advisors Lisa O’Connor on key global macro themes and “Currency War” in Asia





Lindsey Clavel from Hedgebay on Hedge Fund Secondary Markets Opalesque.TV interview Part 1





Swan Re targets 20% ROE using reinsurance premium float





Hollard Stable Fund: No down year since 2003 launch, CAGR of 16.0%


 


KeyQuant: The benefits of an all-weather, fully systematic trading model





The Alternative Answer Provides Logical Framework For Analysis, Tackles Controversy With Intellectual Gravitas





How non-EU managers can access Europe without being licensed under AIFMD





Jessica McCarroll: Silverhorn Dynamic Relative Value Fund combines risk-on and risk-off investment modes





Jean Pierre Verster: "Quantamental" investing helps managers and investors avoid behavioral biases


 


Private debt access: New multi-manager fund offers exposure to niche strategies





Prof. Dr. Peter Meier unveils science-based total risk rating of hedge funds





Arnaud Chretien: Using quant power to target optimal risk allocation





WyeTree Asset Management: Opportunities in the $1 trillion RMBS market





Ernest Jaffarian: Why every institutional portfolio needs exposure to managed futures


 


The Probabilities Fund: Trend Following in 40 Act mutual fund format





Uys Meyer: South African hedge fund pioneer re-opens commodity fund





Angelo Robles:  Examining the decision to form a single family office





Private pension manager forecasts "great merger" between traditional PE and hedge fund managers





Simon Lack's new book, "The Crisis Facing Fixed Income Investors"


 


How the Asian hedge fund industry grew from a few dozen to almost 1000 managers





Stratton Street Capital: Investing in wider horizons





Key differences between the European RMBS market and US non-agency market





Almost twice as many foreign managers comply with Swiss than with AIFM distribution rules





Dr. Tillmann Sachs: Bringing self-learning models and adaptive algorithms to the CTA industry


 


Louis Gargour: Profiting from Europe, the 'sweet spot' of the credit cycle





Performance Chasing & Bad Timing: When Investors Fail





“Hedge fund reinsurers” face criticism, but is it warranted?





Mark Okada (Highland Capital Management, LP):  The future of the CLO space (Part 2) Opalesque.TV interview Part 2





Flat markets, high volatility force Aussie institutions, superannuation funds and high net-worth investors to research and invest into domestic hedge funds


 


CoroCapital: A hedge fund’s success is determined pre-launch





Shining light on the shadow banking business... Private credit and enforcement in China: Better than you think





Tower Capital: Getting liquid access to African frontier markets





Rebound and opportunities in U.S. REITS and global real estate





Martin Estlander: Are Nordic CTAs different from their U.S. or London peers?


 


Stephane Pizzo: Conflicts of interests, the hidden malaise of hedge funds





Masahiro Koshiba: How long can hedge funds benefit from Abenomics?





Dr. Amin El Kholy: How is MENA different from typical frontier or emerging markets?





Why every asset manager should care about captive insurance





Making money while sleeping soundly: Swiss 'Compounders' highly attractive


 


Paul Grassi: How hedge fund insurance evolved since 2000





The real question is not are hedge funds good or bad, but what is a good and a bad way to invest in hedge funds





Why 3500 institutions followed technical analyst Greg Troccoli’s trade recommendations





A different type of listed real estate fund: absolute return, thematic fund yields 20.5% net p.a.





Jack Inglis:  AIMA’s future role as hedge fund assets could top $5 trillion


 


Hit ratio of 90% and Sharpe of 8: New solution to old market timing problem





Gibraltar Stock Exchange: Europe’s most competitive and fastest gateway solution for non EU managers, corporates and insurers





Shinichiro Shiraki: How to design investment products Japanese institutions like





MultiStrat Re: Platform concept helps asset managers raise assets as permanent capital through reinsurance





First Trust Advisors targets retail and institutions with  Liquid Alternative ETFs


 


Sea change in Germany as search for yield, diversification pressures investors to allocate to hedge funds, alternatives





Pengana: Accessing Australian asset management talent





Mikael Stenbom, RPM: Identifying the sweet spot - how managers' corporate life cycle affects returns





Better returns, better investor relationships, better process: New position-sizing solution shaking up the industry





Al Masah Capital: Offering access to MENA region in UCITS 4 format


 


CIAM: Activist investing in Europe on promising start





What attracted Ascalon/Westpac to seed Morphic and its adaptive global equity strategies





How SRI is changing capitalism: From tree-hugging to mainstream, if not essential corporate governance





Steve Pratt’s new fund combines Africa exposure, core long term, special ops and momentum/catalyst investments





Marc de Kloe: How you can help private banks to better sell alternatives


 


Harcourt’s superior long-term performance shows there’s real Alpha in fund selection





Self directed superannuation funds:  The most attractive investor base for Aussie hedge funds




More related videos 









Related News







Video Library

Julian Robertson and Tiger Cubs & Seeds
Hedge Fund Investors
Family Offices
Endowments
Private Banks
Pension Fund
Hedge Fund of Funds
Seeders
Sovereign Wealth Funds
Global Macro
CTAs & Managed Futures
Emerging & Frontier Markets
Asia Focus
Latin America
Value/Activist Investing
Green Investing and Agriculture
Niche Strategies
Future of Hedge Funds
Research/Education
Women in Hedge Funds
Uncorrelated Investments Show
Hedge Fund Technology
Real Estate

Video Location

New York (69)
London (28)
Zurich (18)
Singapore (15)
Chicago (14)
Paris (11)
Johannesburg (10)
Amsterdam (7)
Hong Kong (7)
Geneva (6)
Tokyo (6)
Sydney (5)
Dallas (4)
Greenwich, CT (4)
Stockholm (4)
Boston (3)
Buenos Aires (3)
Cape Town (3)
Miami (3)
San Francisco (3)
Hamilton, Bermuda (2)
Las Vegas (2)
Malta (2)
Melbourne (2)
Moscow (2)
Sao Paulo (2)
United Arab Emirates (2)
Auckland (1)
Austin (1)
Austria (1)
Bangkok (1)
Boca Raton (1)
Denver (1)
Dublin (1)
Frankfurt (1)
Gibraltar (1)
Hamburg (1)
Monaco (1)
Shanghai (1)
Toronto (1)
Turkey (1)













Talkback 1 Comment
Please use the comment feature below for your feedback, or email me at knab@opalesque.com. Thank you!
Matthias Knab 									Posted On Mar 20 2017











Tell us what you think 
										- please logon to add your comments 









 Use "anonymous" as my name



Alert me via email on new comments

































Most viewed videos 
Newest Videos






 




					Jack Schwager presents: 15 HedgeFund Market Wizards trading secrets& insights in their own words Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					Meet Danny Yong, Asia's risinghedge fund titan






					Dr. Ping Jiang: One of the world'sforemost macro traders Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					Jim Chanos: Psychology of shortselling; China makes Europe, U.S.debt look like child's play

 




					Julian Robertson Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					Mike Novogratz, President ofFortress Investment Group Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					Jeffrey Ubben: The Evolution of theActive Value Investment Style Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					Izzy Englander (Israel A.Englander) Opalesque.TV interview Part 1

 




					Guy Spier: How Value Investing haschanged -- new strategies ofsuccessful value investors Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					Subduing the enemy: The Ins andOuts of Volatility Trading






					Elena Ambrosiadou Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					So You Want to Start a Hedge Fund?Lessons from 120 early stage hedgefund investments, 40 manager seeds

 




					Tiger Cub David Gerstenhaber: Theeconomist whose passion for marketsbegan at age 14






					Schwager sums up key lessons ofMarket Wizards series, startsglobal search for ‘undiscoveredtraders'






					Anthony Ward, Armajaro






					Jack Schwager's new book “MarketSense and Nonsense” – 30 yearsobserving investment mistakes Opalesque.TV interview Part 2

 




					William Browder (Bill Browder) Opalesque.TV interview Part 1






					Anthony Scaramucci/SkyBridgeCapital: Fund of funds &seeder, finding the next Ray Dalio,Daniel Och






					George Schultze:  The Art ofVulture Investing






					Karsten Schroeder, AmplitudeCapital: Can German engineeringdrive a CTA? Opalesque.TV interview Part 1

 




					Doug Barnett: The hedge fundmanager of hedge fund managers






					Chess Grandmaster turns hedge fundmanager seeded by Peter Thiel






					Chenavari Investment Managers: Oneof Europe's top performing hedgefunds






					Steve Diggle: Artradis FundManagement, Singapore's largesthedge fund Opalesque.TV interview Part 1

 




					Chronic difficulty and failureraising assets: Why 89% of allhedge funds never get over $100m






					Why a family office moves assetsfrom mega to smaller hedge funds& the six criteria how toselect hedge funds






					The “Twitter Hedge Fund”:Harnessing the power of socialmedia for investment direction






					Kerrisdale Capital: How do peoplereact these days to a hedge fundmaking 200% a year? Opalesque.TV interview Part 1

 

Total  251 video(s) Found
										

More Videos:   1 2 3 4 5 … Next




















Company Information
About Opalesque
History
Awards & Reviews
Testimonials
Privacy & Security
Media Kit
Contact


Publications
 Alternative Market Briefing

Technical Research



Opalesque Roundtables


Research

Technical Research

NEW MANAGERS



Products & Services

Events


Connect with Opalesque


Subscribe to our Services
Subscribe to our RSS feed
Connect with us on LinkedIn
Follow us on Twitter
Subscribe to Opalesque.TV



back to top


Publisher Opalesque. is a member of the Opalesque Group. ©  2001-17 Opalesque. | All rights reserved. Please visit other member firms and services of the Opalesque Group: 
		
		
		Opalesque Publications  | Hedge-Professionals Database  | Opalesque Solutions






















AltX
AltX















































Home
Product
About
Press
Careers
Blog
Login
 








Which Hedge Fund Strategies Performed Best in 2016?


AltX complied data for over 400 leading hedge funds to identify which strategies performed best on average in 2016 and other key industry trends. After a poor year of performance in 2015, Event Driven funds bounced back to outperform all other strategies in 2016 with the bulk of the funds ending the year with positive performance. … Continued


Published on March 16, 2017






Who are the 20 most commonly approved managers by each bank?


AltX has compiled a full report of the hedge funds approved by each private bank for direct investment by their largest customers.  For a sneak peek – check out the top twenty most commonly approved managers and the number of funds approved by each bank below. Want to compare your fund metrics?  Should you be … Continued


Published on October 25, 2016






Mid-Year Review by Investor, Manager and Strategy


The latest installment of our Mid-year Hedge Fund Industry Review gives you the breakdown by investor, by hedge fund manager, and by strategy across the private banks, fund of funds, and separate account platforms where we have transparency into their allocations.  See below: The full report is available only to subscribers. Subscribers can also gain access to our industry … Continued


Published on October 18, 2016






New Update: Lighthouse Investment Partners


As reported by the AltX ADV event alert system, Lighthouse Investment Partners has disclosed updated changes to their manager lineup and sector exposures. As you can see in this breakdown by sector, Lighthouse sub-advisors have aggressively increased exposure to long/short equity, while cutting back significantly from credit and event driven. Solus and Bronson Point were removed … Continued


Published on October 11, 2016






AltX Mid-Year Service Provider Review 2016


Following up on yesterday’s Mid-Year Hedge Fund Review, AltX data shows the following 1H16 Service Provider leader board:   To subscribe or request access a copy of the full report, email altxsales@getaltx.com


Published on September 28, 2016






AltX Mid-Year Hedge Fund Review


As a part of our recently-compiled Mid-Year Hedge Fund Review, we’ve compiled an extensive analysis on the fund universe.  Because of our unique access to fund returns, we provide a broad overview that truly represents the performance of the overall market. For this analysis, we have incorporated over 85% of the managers listed in the most … Continued


Published on September 27, 2016






Morgan Stanley Adds to Macro Allocation


Morgan Stanley issued new regulatory filings this week showing investments in several rapidly growing Global Macro funds: GSA Trend Fund Andurand Capital Two Sigma Absolute Return Macro Enhanced They also made new investments in several other funds: Key Square Tide Point Numina   Click here to see this ADV Page in AltX!   Click here to … Continued


Published on September 9, 2016






Lighthouse Investment Partners – ADV Changes


  Kerrisdale Advisers MAP 185, A SEGREGATED PORTFOLIO OF LMA SPC Lorem Ipsum Management MAP 190, A SEGREGATED PORTFOLIO OF LMA SPC York Capital Management YORK GLOBAL VALUE SP, A SEGREGATED PORTFOLIO OF LGMA SPC MAP 156, A SEGREGATED PORTFOLIO OF LMA SPC YORK GLOBAL VALUE SERIES, A SERIES OF LGMA LLC MAP 159, A … Continued


Published on August 23, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week – August 15th


Anchorage Capital Partners Offshore Ltd Dymon Asia Macro (US) Fund ESG Cross Border Equity Fund LP Field Street Global Investments US LP Field Street Partners LP Fine Partners I LP Hoplite Partners LP Hound Partners LP Hutchin Hill Capital Offshore Fund Ltd. Indus Pacific Opportunities Fund LP Light Street Argon LP Light Street Xenon Ltd … Continued


Published on August 16, 2016






Tenaron Capital Files New ADV: What Changed?




Published on August 9, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week – August 8th


AG Mortgage Value Partners, LP AG SCS Fund, LP Brahman Partners II Offshore, Ltd. Brahman Partners III, LP Broadfin Healthcare Fund, LP Discovery Global Macro Fund, Ltd. Falcon Edge Global LP GSO Special Situations Fund, LP Horizon Portfolio I Limited Lomas Capital, Ltd. Luxor Capital Partners Offshore, Ltd. Moore Global Investments Ltd. PDT Partners Offshore … Continued


Published on August 9, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week – August 1st


Eminence Fund, Ltd. Tide Point Partners, LP Highfields Capital, Ltd. Two Sigma Eclipse Cayman Fund, Ltd. Samlyn Offshore Ltd. Suvretta Offshore Fund, Ltd. Starboard Value and Opportunity Fund LP Pershing Square International Ltd. Brenner West Capital Opportunity Offshore Fund Ltd. Sheffield International Partners Ltd. EJF Debt Opportunities Fund, LP Matrix Capital Management Fund (Offshore), Ltd. … Continued


Published on August 4, 2016






PAAMCO allocates big to Corrib Capital


Click here to see Corrib’s performance.                 Schedule a demo of the AltX platform.


Published on August 1, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week – July 25th


Myriad Opportunities Offshore Fund Ltd. Tekne Offshore Fund Ltd. Kildonan Castle Global Credit Opportunity Fund Ltd. Bybrook Capital Fund Ltd. BBL Commodities Value Offshore Squadra Equity Fund Ltd. Astellon Special Opportunities Fund AHL (Cayman) SPC Gotham Targeted Neutral Ltd. Greywolf Overseas Fund Halcyon Senior Loan Fund I Offshore Ltd. Cerberus Global Residential Mortgage Opportunity Feeder … Continued


Published on July 28, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week – July 19th


Astenbeck Offshore Commodities Fund II Ltd. Macrosynergy Trading Fund Ltd. CC+ Fund Ltd. Rokos Global Macro Fund Ltd. SEG Partners Offshore Ltd. Stone Milliner Macro Fund Ltd. Koppenberg Macro Commodity Fund Ltd. Prosiris Global Opportunities Ltd. Hitchwood Capital Fund Ltd. Impala Fund LP Children’s Investment Fund Fir Tree International Value Fund II Ltd. York Investment … Continued


Published on July 18, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week – July 12th


Nokota Capital Offshore Fund Ltd Guard Macro Offshore Feeder Fund GSA QMS Fund Ltd GSA International Fund Ltd Edgestream NIAS Fund Ltd York European Opportunities Fund LP York Credit Opportunities Fund LP Third Point Ultra Ltd Third Point Hellenic Recovery US Feeder Fund LP Sola Ltd Premium Point Mortgage Credit Fund LP Silver Point Capital … Continued


Published on July 11, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week – July 5th


Aurelius Capital International, Ltd. Bay Pond Partners, LP Brevan Howard Argentina Fund Limited Element Capital Feeder Fund Ltd. ESG Domestic Opportunity Fund, LP FVP US-Q, LP Greenlight Capital Offshore (Gold), Ltd. Indaba Capital Partners (Cayman) LP London Select Fund, Ltd. Marianas Fund Ltd. Miura Global Partners II, LP North Run Offshore Partners, Ltd. Panning Overseas … Continued


Published on July 5, 2016






AltX_Estimates: Funds Loaded This Week


Long/Short Equity TPG-AXON PARTNERS, LP GLENVIEW INSTITUTIONAL PARTNERS, L.P. VIKING GLOBAL EQUITIES III LTD. Multi-Strategy HBK MULTI-STRATEGY OFFSHORE FUND LTD. D. E. SHAW COMPOSITE FUND, L.L.C. FARALLON CAPITAL PARTNERS, L.P. Event Driven THIRD POINT PARTNERS QUALIFIED L.P. TACONIC OPPORTUNITY FUND L.P. PAULSON ENHANCED LTD


Published on June 30, 2016






Aetos Capital Disclosed New Allocations by Strategy


Click here to see Aetos on AltX!


Published on June 28, 2016






WHICH FIRM INVESTED THE MOST IN VISIUM?


UBS Hedge Fund Solutions Aetna Capital Management Morgan Stanley Investment Management Blackstone Alternative Asset Management Hatteras Funds via Morgan Creek Capital Managment Steben & Company Arden Asset Management Citi Private Advisory –> $232mn Altegris Advisors   Fund Name Structure Domicile  GAUM  FoF Min. Investment Beneficial Owners HEDGEFORUM VISIUM, LTD – CLASS BAL Standalone Cayman Islands  $      … Continued


Published on June 24, 2016






Older Entries »














			Your browser does not support the video tag.
		









			Your browser does not support the video tag.
		

























 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















































































 United States


Personal Investing 




					            TRowePrice.com
					        



					            Personal Investing
					        



					            Workplace Retirement
					        



					            Institutional Investor
					        



					            Institutional Consultant
					        



					            Financial Advisor/Intermediary
					        



			            		Recordkeeping Sponsor/Consultant
			            	























Log Out
Log In


Open an Account
About Us
Help
















My Accounts





Portfolio


Transactions


Statements & Documents


Profile






Mutual Funds






Daily Prices




Historical Performance




Dividend Distributions




Mutual Fund Research Tool




Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds




Bond Funds




Target Date Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds




Prospectuses & Reports







Retirement






IRA




Rollover IRA




Retirement Planning




Required Minimum Distributions




Small Business Retirement Plans




403(b) Plans







Planning & Research






Advice




Investing 101




Asset Allocation Planning




Retirement Planning




College Planning




Tax Planning




Estate Planning




Research & Analysis




T. Rowe Price Insights




Planning & Resources




Charitable Giving







Products & Services






ActivePlus Portfolios




College Savings Plans




Non Retirement Accounts




Private Asset Management




Select Client Services




Advisory Planning Services




Brokerage




Investor Centers





















T. Rowe Price Value Fund (TRVLX)









Home
	  	 / 
	  	 Mutual Funds









					T. Rowe Price
					
					
			
			
			
				Value Fund
				
			
		
	







Print this page
Email this page
Text size



New! Quarterly Fund Fact Sheet Now Available



Ticker Symbol:


			
				TRVLX
			
		


Fund Status:

Open to new Retail investors	   
					
					
				
				 / 
			
			
				
					
						Open to subsequent Retail investments











 





Snapshot

Objective

Performance

Composition

Management

Expenses/Minimums

Compare






		Fund Snapshot
	



Quick Stats



Current NAV
						
							as of
							
								07/25/2017
							
						



			  		
			  			
						  
						  
							$37.30
						  
						
					
				



NAV Change


					
			  			
						  
						  
							$0.13
						  
						
					
				



Daily YTD Return
							
								as of
								
									07/25/2017
								
							



						
							
								
								10.85%
							
						
					


NAV 12 Month Low-High

						
						  
						  
							
								$32.22
							
							-
							
								$37.30
							
						  
						
					



Net Assets
						
							as of
						    
								06/30/2017
						 	
						



					
						$24,364.55

					
					Million
				



Morningstar Ratings1


as of 06/30/2017



Overall





3 Year





5 Year





10 Year







				Morningstar rated the Value Fund among 
1091,
1091,
936
and 
681
Large Value
funds for the overall rating and the 3-, 5-, and 10-year periods (as applicable) 
ending 06/30/2017, respectively.


The Overall Morningstar Rating for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance 
figures associated with its three-, five-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The 
weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year 
rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% five-year rating/20% three-year rating 
for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating formula seems to give the most 
weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest impact because it is 
included in all three rating periods.
			

Performance Comparison
as of 
					
						06/30/2017
					
				







							This chart shows the value of a hypothetical $10,000 investment in the fund over the past 10 years or since its inception (for funds lacking 10-year records). The result is compared with benchmarks, which may include a broad-based market index and a peer group average or index. Market indexes do not include expenses, which are deducted from fund returns as well as mutual fund averages and indexes.
						
Benchmark Definitions



1 The Morningstar Rating for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for managed products (including mutual funds, 
variable annuity and variable life subaccounts, exchange-traded funds, closed-end funds, and separate accounts) with at 
least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for 
comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation 
in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent 
performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 
35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star. The Overall Morningstar Rating 
for a managed product is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with its three-, five-, 
and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating metrics. The weights are: 100% three-year rating for 36-59 months of 
total returns, 60% five-year rating/40% three-year rating for 60-119 months of total returns, and 50% 10-year rating/30% 
five-year rating/20% three-year rating for 120 or more months of total returns. While the 10-year overall star rating 
formula seems to give the most weight to the 10-year period, the most recent three-year period actually has the greatest 
impact because it is included in all three rating periods.

			

				
				
Source for Morningstar data: © 2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; 
(2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. 
Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising 
from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
			



Average Annual Total Returns and Benchmarks
as of
						06/30/2017
					











Benchmark Definitions

Investment Objective

			The fund seeks to provide long-term capital appreciation by investing in common stocks believed to be undervalued. Income is a secondary objective.
		
Average Annual Total Returns 2



 
MonthEnd
				06/30/2017
			
QuarterEnd
				06/30/2017
			


1 Year


				
					17.93%
				
			

				
					17.93%
				
			


3 Years

				
					7.11%
				
			

				
					7.11%
				
			


5 Years

				
					15.40%
				
			

				
					15.40%
				
			


10 Years

				
					6.62%
				
			

				
					6.62%
				
			


Since Inception

				
					
					
						
											
							 11.07%
						
						


				
					
					
						
							11.07%
						
						



Inception Date

						
							September 30, 1994
						
					




Gross Expense Ratio^


					
						0.82%
					
				





Net Expense Ratio^


					
						0.82%
					
				



Waiver Type

				
					
					
					
						N/A
					
				
			


Limitation Expires

				
					
						N/A
					
					
				
			




				Current performance may be lower or higher than the quoted past performance, which cannot guarantee future results. 
Share price, principal value, and return will vary and you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.   								
			



2
					
					Average annual total return figures include changes in principal value, reinvested dividends, and capital gain distributions. 
For funds less than one year old, the Since Inception return figure is not annualized and represents an aggregate total return.
				

^ The gross expense ratio reflects the fund expenses as stated in the fee table of the fund's 
prospectus prior to the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement. 
The net expense ratio reflects fund expenses after the deduction of any waiver or reimbursement.
If a fund has an active contractual expense ratio limitation, the expiration date is shown below the gross and net
expense ratio values above.  Expense ratios are as of the most recent prospectus.
	

























Open an Account




Transact & Trade




View/Update Accounts




Help Center












			Find a Fund
		



Select Fund By Name

Africa & Middle East - I Cl

Africa & Middle East Fund

Asia Opportunities

Asia Opportunities - I Cl

Balanced

Balanced - I Cl

Blue Chip Growth

Blue Chip Growth - I Cl

California Tax-Free Bond

California Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

California Tax-Free Money

California Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Capital Appreciation

Capital Appreciation - I Cl

Capital Opportunity

Capital Opportunity - I Cl

Cash Reserves

Corporate Income

Corporate Income - I Cl

Credit Opportunities

Credit Opportunities - I Cl

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth

Diversified Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Dividend Growth

Dividend Growth - I Cl

Dynamic Global Bond

Dynamic Global Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Corporate Bond - I Cl

Em Mkts Local Currency Bond - I Cl

Emerging Europe

Emerging Europe - I Cl

Emerging Markets Bond

Emerging Markets Bond - I Cl

Emerging Markets Corporate Bond

Emerging Markets Local Currency Bond

Emerging Markets Stock

Emerging Markets Stock - I Cl

Emerging Markets Value Stock

Emerging Markets Value Stock - I Cl

Equity Income

Equity Income - I Cl

Equity Index 500

Equity Index 500 - I Cl

European Stock

European Stock - I Cl

Extended Equity Market Index

Financial Services

Financial Services - I Cl

Floating Rate

Floating Rate - I Cl

Georgia Tax-Free Bond

Georgia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Global Allocation

Global Allocation - I Cl

Global Consumer

Global Growth Stock

Global Growth Stock - I Cl

Global High Income Bond

Global High Income Bond - I Cl

Global Industrials

Global Industrials - I Cl

Global Multi-Sector Bond

Global Multi-Sector Bond - I Cl

Global Real Estate - I Cl

Global Real Estate Fund

Global Stock

Global Stock - I Cl

Global Technology - I Cl

Global Technology Fund

GNMA

GNMA - I Cl

Government Money

Government Money - I Cl

Growth & Income

Growth & Income - I Cl

Growth Stock

Growth Stock - I Cl

Health Sciences

Health Sciences - I Cl

High Yield

High Yield - I Cl

Inflation Protected Bond

Inflation Protected Bond - I Cl

Intermediate Tax-Free High Yield

Intermediate Tax-Free HY - I Cl

International Bond

International Bond - I Cl

International Concentrated Eq - I Cl

International Concentrated Equity

International Discovery

International Discovery - I Cl

International Equity Index

International Stock

International Stock - I Cl

International Value Equity

International Value Equity - I Cl

Japan

Japan - I Cl

Latin America

Latin America - I Cl

Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bd

Lmtd Duration Infl Focused Bd - I Cl

Maryland Short-Term Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Short-Term Tx-Fr Bnd - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Bond

Maryland Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

Maryland Tax-Free Money

Maryland Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Media & Telecommunications

Media & Telecommunications - I Cl

Mid-Cap Growth

Mid-Cap Growth - I Cl

Mid-Cap Value

Mid-Cap Value - I Cl

New America Growth

New America Growth - I Cl

New Asia

New Asia - I Cl

New Era

New Era - I Cl

New Horizons

New Horizons - I Cl

New Income

New Income - I Cl

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond

New Jersey Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Bond

New York Tax-Free Bond - I Cl

New York Tax-Free Money

New York Tax-Free Money - I Cl

Overseas Stock - I Cl

Overseas Stock Fund

Personal Strategy Balanced

Personal Strategy Balanced - I Cl

Personal Strategy Growth

Personal Strategy Growth - I Cl

Personal Strategy Income

Personal Strategy Income - I Cl

QM Global Equity

QM Global Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Eq - I Cl

QM U.S. Small & Mid-Cap Core Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity

QM U.S. Small-Cap Growth Equity - I Cl

QM U.S. Value Equity

QM U.S. Value Equity - I Cl

Real Assets

Real Assets - I Cl

Real Estate

Real Estate - I Cl

Retirement 2005 Fund

Retirement 2010 Fund

Retirement 2015 Fund

Retirement 2020 Fund

Retirement 2025 Fund

Retirement 2030 Fund

Retirement 2035 Fund

Retirement 2040 Fund

Retirement 2045 Fund

Retirement 2050 Fund

Retirement 2055 Fund

Retirement 2060 Fund

Retirement Balanced Fund

Retirement Balanced I - I Cl

Retirement I 2005 - I Cl

Retirement I 2010 - I Cl

Retirement I 2015 - I Cl

Retirement I 2020 - I Cl

Retirement I 2025 - I Cl

Retirement I 2030 - I Cl

Retirement I 2035 - I Cl

Retirement I 2040 - I Cl

Retirement I 2045 - I Cl

Retirement I 2050 - I Cl

Retirement I 2055 - I Cl

Retirement I 2060 - I Cl

Retirement Income 2020

Science & Technology

Science & Technology - I Cl

Short-Term Bond

Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Small-Cap Stock

Small-Cap Stock - I Cl

Small-Cap Value

Small-Cap Value - I Cl

Spectrum Growth

Spectrum Income

Spectrum International

Summit Municipal Income

Summit Municipal Intermediate

Summit Municipal Money Market

Target 2005

Target 2005 - I Cl

Target 2010

Target 2010 - I Cl

Target 2015

Target 2015 - I Cl

Target 2020

Target 2020 - I Cl

Target 2025

Target 2025 - I Cl

Target 2030

Target 2030 - I Cl

Target 2035

Target 2035 - I Cl

Target 2040

Target 2040 - I Cl

Target 2045

Target 2045 - I Cl

Target 2050

Target 2050 - I Cl

Target 2055

Target 2055 - I Cl

Target 2060

Target 2060 - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity - I Cl

Tax-Efficient Equity Fund

Tax-Exempt Money

Tax-Exempt Money - I Cl

Tax-Free High Yield

Tax-Free High Yield - I Cl

Tax-Free Income

Tax-Free Income - I Cl

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate

Tax-Free Short-Intermediate - I Cl

Total Equity Market Index

Total Return

Total Return - I Cl

U.S. Bond Enhanced Index

U.S. High Yield

U.S. High Yield - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core - I Cl

U.S. Large-Cap Core Fund

U.S. Treasury Intermediate

U.S. Treasury Intermediate - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Long-Term

U.S. Treasury Long-Term - I Cl

U.S. Treasury Money

U.S. Treasury Money - I Cl

Ultra Short-Term Bond

Ultra Short-Term Bond - I Cl

Value

Value - I Cl

Virginia Tax-Free Bond

Virginia Tax-Free Bond - I Cl




Select By Ticker Symbol
GTFBX
MDXBX
NJTFX
NYTXX
OTCFX
OTIIX
PBDIX
PCCOX
PCTXX
PDGIX
PEXMX
PGLOX
PGMSX
PGTIX
PIEQX
PNAIX
PNSIX
POMIX
PPIPX
PRAFX
PRAMX
PRASX
PRCIX
PRCNX
PRCOX
PRCPX
PRDGX
PRDMX
PRDSX
PREFX
PREIX
PRELX
PREMX
PRESX
PRFDX
PRFHX
PRFRX
PRFSX
PRGFX
PRGIX
PRGMX
PRGSX
PRGTX
PRHIX
PRHSX
PRHYX
PRIDX
PRIHX
PRIJX
PRIKX
PRINX
PRIPX
PRISX
PRITX
PRIUX
PRJIX
PRJPX
PRKIX
PRLAX
PRMDX
PRMSX
PRMTX
PRNEX
PRNHX
PRNYX
PRPIX
PRRXX
PRSCX
PRSGX
PRSIX
PRSMX
PRSNX
PRSVX
PRTAX
PRTIX
PRTXX
PRUFX
PRUIX
PRULX
PRUUX
PRVAX
PRVIX
PRWAX
PRWBX
PRWCX
PRXAX
PRXCX
PRXEX
PRXIX
PRZIX
PSILX
PTEXX
PTKIX
PTTFX
PTYIX
RBAIX
RCLIX
REIPX
REVIX
RGGIX
RICIX
RJAIX
RLAIX
RPBAX
RPEIX
RPGAX
RPGEX
RPGIX
RPGRX
RPIBX
RPIEX
RPIHX
RPISX
RPMGX
RPOIX
RPSIX
RPTFX
RPTIX
RPTTX
TBCIX
TBGAX
TBSIX
TCBXX
TCFEX
TCRRX
TECIX
TEEFX
TEIMX
TERXX
TEUIX
TFAIX
TFBIX
TFBVX
TFHAX
TFIFX
TFILX
TFRRX
TGAFX
TGIPX
TGTIX
THISX
TICCX
TIDDX
TIIPX
TIRGX
TIRRX
TMDXX
TOORX
TORFX
TPGPX
TPPAX
TQAIX
TQGEX
TQGIX
TQMVX
TQSIX
TQSMX
TQVIX
TRAIX
TRAMX
TRAOX
TRARX
TRASX
TRBCX
TRBFX
TRBRX
TRBUX
TRECX
TREMX
TRFFX
TRFGX
TRFOX
TRFWX
TRGAX
TRGLX
TRGRX
TRGXX
TRHRX
TRIGX
TRJIX
TRLAX
TRLDX
TRMCX
TRMIX
TRMUX
TRNEX
TRNXX
TROIX
TROSX
TRPAX
TRPBX
TRPCX
TRPDX
TRPFX
TRPHX
TRPIX
TRPJX
TRPKX
TRPLX
TRPMX
TRPNX
TRPPX
TRPTX
TRRAX
TRRBX
TRRCX
TRRDX
TRREX
TRRFX
TRRGX
TRRHX
TRRIX
TRRJX
TRRKX
TRRLX
TRRMX
TRRNX
TRROX
TRRTX
TRRUX
TRRVX
TRRWX
TRSGX
TRSTX
TRSXX
TRTFX
TRTIX
TRULX
TRVLX
TRVVX
TRXRX
TRYIX
TSCXX
TSNIX
TTEEX
TTGXX
TTMIX
TTOIX
TTRTX
TTSIX
TTURX
TUHIX
TUHYX
TWNXX
TWRRX


More






Fund Information



Download a Prospectus
Download a Semi-Annual Report
Download an Annual Report
Download Statement of Additional Information
Year-End Dividend Distributions
Year-End Tax Considerations
Dividend Distribution Dates

 





Related Links



Also available to certain investors as a lower cost I Class mutual fund.



























Our Mission Is Simple.
	          Help clients around the world achieve their long-term investment goals. 
	        


Connect with us
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
LinkedIn




Company Overview
Responsibility
Careers
Investor Relations
Press Releases




Site Map
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
Security Measures
Legal Information
Customer Agreement




Feedback
Mobile Solutions
Contact Us







The mutual funds referred to in this website are offered and sold only to persons residing in the United States and are offered by prospectus only. The prospectuses include investment objectives, risks, fees, expenses, and other information that you should read and consider carefully before investing.
Download a prospectus.

					©2017. All Rights Reserved. T. Rowe Price Investment Services, Inc., distributor, T. Rowe Price mutual funds. T. ROWE PRICE, INVEST WITH CONFIDENCE, and the bighorn sheep design are trademarks of T. Rowe Price Group, Inc. 
					All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. 
				











Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds - Mutual Funds | T. Rowe Price | T. Rowe Price























 















Home
Mutual Funds
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds









Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*









Invest Now

Call us at 877-495-1138



Download a Prospectus












Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Stock Funds



U.S. Stock Funds



International and Global Stock Funds




Bond Funds



U.S. Bond Funds



International and Global Bond Funds




Target Date Funds



Retirement Funds



Target Funds



Income Funds




Asset Allocation Funds




Money Market Funds










                Find a fund
			














Browse all T. Rowe Price
 mutual funds
















Many of our mutual funds earn Morningstar’s highest ratings
Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds







Because of our disciplined approach to investing, Morningstar, a leader in independent investment research, recognizes many of our mutual funds with its highest ratings in the funds' respective categories.

Over 70 of our funds have earned 4- or 5-star Overall Morningstar Ratings as of 5/31/17.*

Morningstar uses a 5-star system to rate mutual funds based on their risk-adjusted returns. Five stars is the highest while one star is the lowest rating. Only the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) are awarded Morningstar's 4- or 5-star rating. By comparison, as of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor Class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.​ Past performance cannot guarantee future results.

View all 4- and 5-star rated funds
 

Explore Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds




Fund Name(ticker)
  


MorningstarCategory
  


Overall MorningstarRating™
  


No. ofFunds InCategory
  


Risk/RewardPotential**
  








Fund Name (ticker)

Morningstar Category

Overall Morningstar Rating™

No. of Funds In Category
Risk/Reward Potential









Compare Morningstar 4- and 5-Star Rated Funds












	            Find a fund
	        












Browse all T. Rowe Price mutual funds










T. Rowe Price Insights&reg



Markets & Economy

Monthly Market Review


		                        					Stay informed about global economic developments and our perspective on market conditions. Read more...






														
							    							 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							






Markets & Economy

Global Markets Weekly Update


		                        					Keep up-to-date on our views on developments in global capital markets. Read more...






														
							    							
							    							                      
								        						July 21, 2017 
							    							
														                    
		                							
		                  							Source:
		                  							
			                    						T. Rowe Price
		                    							
		                							
	                   							










All mutual funds are subject to market risk, including possible loss of principal.
*Morningstar gives its best ratings of 5 or 4 stars to the top 32.5% of all funds (of the 32.5%, 10% get 5 stars and 22.5% get 4 stars) based on their risk-adjusted returns. The Overall Morningstar Rating™ is derived from a weighted average of the performance figures associated with a fund's 3-, 5-, and 10-year (if applicable) Morningstar Rating™ metrics. As of 5/31/17, 72 of 106 of our rated funds (Investor class only) received an overall rating of 5 or 4 stars.
The Morningstar RatingTM for funds, or "star rating", is calculated for funds with at least a three-year history. Exchange-traded funds and open-ended mutual funds are considered a single population for comparative purposes. It is calculated based on a Morningstar Risk-Adjusted Return measure that accounts for variation in a managed product's monthly excess performance, placing more emphasis on downward variations and rewarding consistent performance. The top 10% of products in each product category receive 5 stars, the next 22.5% receive 4 stars, the next 35% receive 3 stars, the next 22.5% receive 2 stars, and the bottom 10% receive 1 star.

Source for Morningstar data: ©2017 Morningstar, Inc. All Rights Reserved. The information contained herein: (1) is proprietary to Morningstar and/or its content providers; (2) may not be copied or distributed; and (3) is not warranted to be accurate, complete or timely. Neither Morningstar nor its content providers are responsible for any damages or losses arising from any use of this information. Past performance is no guarantee of future results.
**This chart displays relative risk of each U.S. mutual fund listed using standard deviation of returns. Those values are provided in the bars at the top of the chart.
Methodology: We evaluate the standard deviation and its resulting placement within a specific risk/return category on an annual basis. A fund is generally placed in a risk/return category based on the 10-year standard deviation of its performance. If a fund is less than 10 years old, the actual fund performance history is supplemented with the primary prospectus benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years. For an Asset Allocation fund with less than 10 years of performance history, sub-strategy returns are used. When a sub-strategy is less than 10 years old, the actual sub-strategy performance history is supplemented with benchmark history to obtain a full 10-year history, or longest time period available up to 10 years.
Risk return categories overlap; a fund with a standard deviation in the overlap between two categories, denoted by a plus (+), is placed so that its risk categorization is better aligned with anticipated return characteristics an investor may experience going forward at the discretion of T Rowe Price.
When a fund has a cash-like benchmark, denoted by a double plus (++), its standard deviation is estimated using only available fund returns. If the fund is less than 10 years old, benchmark returns are not used to obtain a full 10-year history because they would artificially suppress the volatility estimate.
All investments are subject to market risk, including the possible loss of principal. Standard deviation of returns, a measure of price volatility, is one measure of risk. Please consult the funds’ prospectuses for a more complete discussion of the funds’ risks.
+ California Tax-Free Money Fund, Capital Appreciation Fund, Equity Income Fund, Global Allocation Fund, Global Industrials Fund, GNMA Fund, Inflation Protected Bond Fund, International Bond Fund, International Stock Fund, Japan Fund, Limited Duration Inflation Focused Bond Fund, New Era Fund, Personal Strategy Balanced Fund, Personal Strategy Income Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM Global Equity Fund, QM U.S. Value Equity Fund, Retirement 2015 Fund, Retirement 2035 Fund, Retirement 2040 Fund, Retirement 2045 Fund, Retirement 2050 Fund, Retirement 2055 Fund, Retirement 2060 Fund, Short-Term Bond Fund, Spectrum International Fund, Summit Municipal Intermediate Fund, Target 2010 Fund, Target 2025 Fund, Target 2050 Fund, Target 2055 Fund, Target 2060 Fund, Tax-Free Short-Intermediate Fund, Total Equity Market Index Fund, Ultra Short-Term Bond Fund
++ Global Unconstrained Bond Fund






















Roth or Traditional IRA  | T. Rowe Price





















 
















Home
Retirement
IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 












Roth or Traditional IRA
Compare Roth and Traditional IRAs














Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs



    	Navigate To...
        



Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Roth or Traditional IRA 
Rollover and Transfer IRAs





















When it comes to making a thoughtful decision between a Roth IRA and a Traditional IRA, it helps to understand the differences.










 
Roth IRA
Traditional IRA
Taxes
Contributions made are not deductible.
Contributions made can be tax-deductible or non-deductible. Deductibility of contributions depends on active participation in a retirement plan and your modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) not exceeding certain amounts.
Withdrawal of contributions

Withdraw anytime without taxes or penalties.
Withdraw anytime but deductible contributions are taxable and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Withdrawal of Earnings
Tax- and penalty-free when withdrawn at age 59½ if account has been active for at least five years.

Taxable when withdrawn and generally subject to penalties if withdrawn before age 59½.

Age restrictions
None.  
Must be under age 70½ during the tax year of the contribution.

Eligibility
May contribute only if, depending on filing status, MAGI does not exceed certain amounts. You must have US earned income.

No restrictions on contributions. You must have US earned income.  
Required minimum distributions (RMDs)
None during your lifetime.
Must begin taking for the year in which you reach age 70½.














Ready to Start? Call 1-877-583-2153









                        Open a Roth IRA
                    














                        Open a Traditional IRA
                    























Still Unsure About Roth vs. Traditional?











				    
						
				        
				            Answer four questions to find out which IRA may be right for you








































Why T. Rowe Price for a Roth or Traditional IRA?





Low Fees and Minimums.




 



You need to maximize your return potential, so we work to keep our fees competitive. That's why our solutions include no-load mutual funds with low expense ratios. Keep in mind that a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA may be subject to an annual fee, and a fee may be assessed when a Traditional IRA/Roth IRA is closed. Here's more information on fees.



















Convenient and Flexible Fund Choices.




 



You can choose from target date funds with strategic asset allocation and diversification, or select from more than 100 mutual funds to suit your investing needs.






            
                
                    
                    Download a Prospectus
                    
                
	            
	        
	    



















A Global Investing Network in Pursuit of Your Goals.




 



Our highly tenured global investment professionals are continuously assessing potential risk, while identifying opportunities to maximize growth potential over the long term so you have more money in retirement.  





























Want to Move Existing Savings Into a Roth IRA?

















Roll over a 401(k)













A Rollover IRA is one of several options to consider for your former workplace retirement plan, such as a 401(k).
 
Explore your options
Roll over now
 

















Transfer an existing IRA












If you decide to transfer an IRA, we offer over 100 mutual funds from which to choose. And we make it easy by handling most of the paperwork, too.
Transfer an IRA now


















Convert your T. Rowe Price Traditional IRA to a Roth IRA









A Roth IRA offers many advantages over a Traditional IRA, like potentially tax-free withdrawals if you need them.
Convert now




































	CMCAX - CM Commodity Index Fund | Snapshot | Mutual Fund- VanEck









Menu



Contact

































United States
Australia
Austria
Chile
Denmark
Finland
Germany
Ireland
Italy
Luxembourg
Netherlands
Norway
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland
United Kingdom
Rest of World








Corporate Home




                                United States
                            




Contact Us



                            Search
                        






























Home » VanEck Funds » Mutual Funds » CMCAX - CM Commodity Index Fund
             » Overview
        









  PDF







Share on Facebook Facebook
Share on StumbleUpon StumbleUpon


Share on LinkedIn LinkedIn
Submit to Reddit reddit


Tweet Twitter
Pin it Pinterest


Share on Google+ Google+
Share on Digg Digg


Post to Tumblr Tumblr
Share on Delicious  Delicious








CMCAXCM Commodity Index Fund
        



















            Ticker:-
            CMCAX;false;CMCITR;
        










            Ticker Group:-
            CMC;false;CMCITR;
        













              Class A - CMCAX
            

              Class I - COMIX
            

              Class Y - CMCYX
            















                Videos


Demand for Oil Strong Despite Anemic Global Growth (3:49)Shawn Reynolds


Commodities Rebound Gaining Momentum (4:11)Roland Morris


View more videos















 
 

















                    Individual Investors




                        Subscribe to email updates
                    

Subscribe now





        Financial Professionals





                    Subscribe to email updates, or 
password protected financial professional-only content
                

                    LOGIN
                


                        email address/username
                    


                         
                    



                        password
                    


                         
                    




New? Register Here


Forgot Password























How To Purchase
Learn more on how to purchase shares of VanEck Funds





























Daily Price
                      
as of 07/25/17




NAV†
DAILY CHANGE


$4.61
 $0.04 / +0.9%

































Class A Details: CMCAX



              INCEPTION DATE
            

              GROSS/NET EXPENSES1


12/31/10
1.31%/0.95%


















                Fund Literature
            


Fact Sheet


Summary Prospectus


Annual Report


Semi-Annual Report


















							Overview
						



							Performance
						



							Portfolio Analytics
						



							Investment Team
						



							Commentary
						



							Fees & Minimums
						















 

Fund Summary and Key Points
The VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund (the "Fund") seeks to track, before fees and expenses, the UBS Bloomberg Constant Maturity Commodity Index (the “CMCI”). CMCI is a next-generation commodity index diversified across maturities, minimizing its exposure to the front end of the futures curvesBy spreading its exposure across multiple maturities and maintaining a constant maturity per commodity, CMCI seeks to mitigate the impacts of negative roll yield in contango environmentsDiversified across five commodity sectors and 27 commodity components; energy allocation typically around 35%In contrast with many “enhanced” commodity funds, offers “pure” commodity exposure by investing in commodity-linked derivative instruments and more conservative fixed income securities, such as U.S. Treasury Bills













 Making the Investment Case for CMCIStrategy Overview: Constant Maturity Commodity Index











                 


Using the Constant Maturity Approach to Commodities (7:28)Roland Morris























Fund Details as of 06/30/17


Net Assets (All Classes)
$327.0M


Number of Commodity Sectors
5


Number of Commodity Components
27


Avg. Weighted Contract Maturity
6.7 Months


Benchmark Index
UBS Bloomberg Constant Maturity Commodity Index (CMCI)



















Investment Approach

The VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund is a passively-managed mutual fund that seeks to track the CMCI by primarily investing in commodity-linked derivative instruments and conservatively-managed fixed income instruments. 


The Fund may invest in instruments linked to the value of a particular commodity or commodity futures contract, or a subset of commodities or commodity futures contracts, through a wholly owned subsidiary of the Fund formed in the Cayman Islands. 






 




























Performance History: Average Annual Total Returns* (%)
                  Month End
                  as of 06/30/17
                  Quarter End
                  as of 06/30/171 MO3 MOYTD1 YR3 YR5 YR10 YRLIFE(12/31/10)VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund: Class AAt Net Asset Value0.00-3.62-4.83-2.73-14.51-8.72---8.48At Maximum 5.75% Sales Charge-5.82-9.22-10.30-8.29-16.19-9.79---9.31UBS Bloomberg CMCI Index20.22-3.28-4.12-1.30-13.27-7.43-3.07--
                  Quarter End as of 06/30/171 MO3 MOYTD1 YR3 YR5 YR10 YRLIFE(12/31/10)VanEck CM Commodity Index Fund: Class AAt Net Asset Value0.00-3.62-4.83-2.73-14.51-8.72---8.48At Maximum 5.75% Sales Charge-5.82-9.22-10.30-8.29-16.19-9.79---9.31UBS Bloomberg CMCI Index20.22-3.28-4.12-1.30-13.27-7.43-3.07--*Returns less than one year are not annualized.The table presents past performance which is no guarantee of future results and which may be lower or higher than current performance. Returns reflect temporary contractual fee waivers and/or expense reimbursements. Had the Fund incurred all expenses and fees1, investment returns would have been reduced. Expenses: Class A: Gross 1.31% and Net 0.95%. Expenses are capped contractually through 05/01/18 at 0.95% for Class A. Investment returns and Fund share values will fluctuate so that investors' shares, when redeemed, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Fund returns assume that dividends and capital gains distributions have been reinvested in the Fund at NAV. 















CMCI Target Sector Weightings (%): Overview for 2016-2017






Sector
% OF NET ASSETS




											■
										
Energy
34.2
#40699c

34.2




											■
										
Agriculture
29.2
#215465

29.2




											■
										
Industrial Metals
26.8
#3c8da3

26.8




											■
										
Precious Metals
5.4
#a3cd3b

5.4




											■
										
Livestock
4.4
#7f9a48

4.4
























Contact UsPrivacyLegalFeedbackSitemap











Important Disclosure 
Unless otherwise stated, portfolio facts and statistics are shown for Class A shares; other classes may have different characteristics. 
†NAV: Unless you are eligible for a waiver, the public offering price you pay when you buy Class A shares of the Fund is the Net Asset Value (NAV) of the shares plus an initial sales charge. The initial sales charge varies depending upon the size of your purchase.  No sales charge is imposed where Class A shares are issued to you pursuant to the automatic investment of income dividends or capital gains distribution. It is the responsibility of the financial intermediary to ensure that the investor obtains the proper “breakpoint” discount. Class I and Class Y do not have an initial sales charge. See the 
                 
    prospectus for more information.
1Van Eck Absolute Return Advisers Corporation (the “Adviser”) has agreed to waive fees and/or pay Fund expenses to the extent necessary to prevent the operating expenses of the Fund (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, interest expense, trading
            expenses, dividends and interest payments on securities sold short, taxes and extraordinary expenses) from exceeding 0.95% for Class A, 0.65% for Class I, and 0.70% for Class Y of the Fund’s average daily net assets per year until May 1, 2018. During such time, the
            expense limitation is expected to continue until the Board of Trustees acts to discontinue all or a portion of such expense limitation.

2The UBS Bloomberg Constant Maturity Commodity Index (CMCI) is a Total Return rules-based composite benchmark index diversified across 27 commodity components from within five sectors, specifically energy, precious metals, industrial metals, agricultural and livestock. The S&P® 500 Index consists of 500 widely held common stocks covering industrial, utility, financial and transportation sectors. The S&P® Goldman Sachs Commodity Total Return Index (SPGSCITR) is a composite index of commodity sector returns, representing an unleveraged, long-only investment in commodity futures. The Bloomberg Barclays US Aggregate Bond (BbgBarc US Agg Bond) Index is composed of the mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities and government/credit bonds. All indices are unmanaged and include the reinvestment of all dividends, but do not reflect the payment of transaction costs, advisory fees or expenses that are associated with an investment in the Fund. An index’s performance is not illustrative of the Fund’s performance. Indices are not securities in which investments can be made.

UBS and Bloomberg own or exclusively license, solely or jointly as agreed between them, all proprietary rights with respect to the Index. In no way do UBS or Bloomberg sponsor or endorse, nor are they otherwise involved in the issuance and offering of the Fund, nor do either of them make any representation or warranty, express or implied, to the holders of the Fund or any member of the public regarding the advisability of investing in the Fund or commodities generally or in futures particularly, or as to results to be obtained from the use of the Index or from the Fund.
The views and opinions expressed are those of VanEck. Fund manager commentaries are general in nature and should not be construed as investment advice. Opinions are subject to change with market conditions. Any discussion of specific securities mentioned in the commentaries is neither an offer to sell nor a solicitation to buy these securities. Fund holdings will vary.

You can lose money by investing in the Fund. Any investment in the Fund should be part of an overall investment program, not a complete program. Commodities are assets that have tangible properties, such as oil, metals, and agriculture. Commodities and commodity-linked derivatives may be affected by overall market movements and other factors that affect the value of a particular industry or commodity, such as weather, disease, embargoes or political or regulatory developments. The value of a commodity-linked derivative is generally based on price movements of a commodity, a commodity futures contract, a commodity index or other economic variables based on the commodity markets. Derivatives use leverage, which may exaggerate a loss. The Fund is subject to the risks associated with its investments in commodity-linked derivatives, risks of investing in wholly owned subsidiary, risk of tracking error, risks of aggressive investment techniques, leverage risk, derivatives risks, counterparty risks, non-diversification risk, credit risk, concentration risk and market risk. The use of commodity-linked derivatives such as swaps, commodity-linked structured notes and futures entails substantial risks, including risk of loss of a significant portion of their principal value, lack of a secondary market, increased volatility, correlation risk, liquidity risk, interest-rate risk, market risk, credit risk, valuation risk and tax risk. Gains and losses from speculative positions in derivatives may be much greater than the derivative’s cost. At any time, the risk of loss of any individual security held by the Fund could be significantly higher than 50% of the security’s value. Investment in commodity markets may not be suitable for all investors. The Fund’s investment in commodity-linked derivative instruments may subject the Fund to greater volatility than investment in traditional securities. For a description of these and other risk considerations, please refer to the Fund’s 
        
    prospectus, which should be read carefully before you invest. Again, the Fund offers investors exposure to the broad commodity markets, currently, by investing in commodity-linked swaps.
Investing involves risk, including possible loss of principal. An investor should consider investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the investment company carefully before investing. The prospectus and summary prospectus contain this and other information.  Please read them carefully before investing.
 
  










Van Eck Securities Corporation, Distributor               
    666 Third Avenue               
    New York, NY 10017
800.826.2333 
©  VanEck. VanEck®, VanEck Vectors®, VanEck Access the opportunities™, and the VanEck design™ are trademarks of Van Eck Associates Corp.










×











